New Jersey, session 222, A3047.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. There is established in the Office of the Secretary of Higher Education the Scientific Conference Grant Program.  Under the grant program, the secretary shall award grants to institutions of higher education that host scientific conferences and seminars in the State.  Grants awarded pursuant to this section shall be used to defray the costs, either in whole or in part, associated with hosting a scientific conference or seminar and may be applied towards the costs of event spaces and speakers, including speaker fees, honoraria, travel, and lodging.  Grants shall not be used to defray food costs or other vendor costs not related to the reservation or use of the event space. b. An institution of higher education may apply to the secretary for a grant.  The application shall include a description and preliminary agenda for the conference or seminar, the names and credentials of all invited speakers, and any relevant information pertaining to the costs of hosting the conference or seminar.  The grants shall be awarded in amounts determined by the secretary. 2.  There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of the Secretary of Higher education the sum of $250,000 to effectuate the provisions of this act. 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.